test/src/morphology/N-pall_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - påll e-stem sipuli: # Noun - full paradigm
     påll+N+Sg+Nom: påll
     påll+N+Sg+Gen: pååll
     påll+N+Sg+Acc: pååll
     påll+N+Sg+Ill: pollu
     påll+N+Sg+Loc: påållast
     påll+N+Sg+Com: påållain
     påll+N+Ess: pållan
     påll+N+Par: pållad
     påll+N+Sg+Abe: påålltää
     påll+N+Pl+Nom: pååll
     påll+N+Pl+Gen: påållai
     påll+N+Pl+Acc: påållaid
     påll+N+Pl+Ill: påållaid
     påll+N+Pl+Loc: påållain
     påll+N+Pl+Com: påållaivui′m
     påll+N+Pl+Abe: påållaitää
